Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 1 COUNTY BOUNDARIES AND COUNTY SEATS
§ 31-115. Camas county.

Camas county is described as follows: beginning at the southwest corner of township two (2) south, range twelve (12) east;

Southern boundary. Thence due east along the township line between townships two (2) and three (3) south, to the southeast corner of township two (2) south, range seventeen (17) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the township line between ranges seventeen (17) and eighteen (18) east, to the southeast corner of section twelve (12), township two (2) south, range seventeen (17) east; thence west one (1) mile, to the southwest corner of section twelve (12), township two (2) south, range seventeen (17) east; thence north along the section line to the intersection of said line and the center of the channel of Big Wood river; thence westerly along said Big Wood river to the junction of Big Wood river and Malad river (or Camas creek); thence westerly along the center of the channel of Malad river (or Camas creek) to the intersection of said river and the section line between sections fourteen (14) and fifteen (15), township one (1) south, range sixteen (16) east; thence north along said section line to the township line between township one (1) south, range sixteen (16) east, and township one (1) north, range sixteen (16) east; thence east along said township line to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township one (1) north, range sixteen (16) east; thence north along the section line two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section twenty-seven (27), township one (1) north, range sixteen (16) east; thence west along the section line one (1) mile to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township one (1) north, range sixteen (16) east; thence northerly along the section line to the main divide between Beaver creek on the west and Camp creek on the east; continuing thence northerly along the summit of the said mountain range or watershed between Beaver creek and Camp creek to its junction with the summit of the mountain range or watershed dividing Willow creek and its tributaries on the west and Big Wood river and its tributaries on the east; thence continuing northerly and westerly along the said last-mentioned summit across Buttercup mountain to a point which is approximately five (5) miles northwest of Buttercup mountain and two (2) miles south of the U.S.G.S. bench mark elevation 7281, on Warm Spring creek, which point is marked “Elevation 8588” on U.S.G.S. topographical map of Idaho Sawtooth quadrangle, edition of January, 1900, reprinted February, 1909; thence continuing along the summit about north thirty-five (35) degrees west to a point designated on said map of said quadrangle as “Elevation 8492”; thence westerly along said summit to a point marked “Elevation 9310” on said map; thence northerly along the summit of the Smoky mountains forming the summit of the watershed dividing the Boise river and its tributaries on the west, the Big Wood river and its tributaries on the east to its intersection with the summit of the Sawtooth mountains at a point marked “Elevation 10,000” on said map, where the said summit of the Sawtooth mountains forms a watershed dividing the Boise river and its tributaries on the west and south, the Salmon river and its tributaries on the west and north, and Big Wood river and its tributaries on the east;

Northern boundary. Thence westerly along the summit of the Sawtooth mountains, where it forms a watershed between the Boise river and its tributaries on the south, and the Salmon river and its tributaries on the north to its intersection with the eastern boundary of Elmore county at a point where the trail crosses the summit of what is known as Mattingly Creek divide;

Western boundary. Thence in a southerly direction along the main divide between the middle fork and the south fork of the Boise river to a point on the divide between Willow creek and Bear creek; thence in a southerly direction on the main divide between Willow creek and Skeleton creek to the center of the channel of the south fork of the Boise river; thence down the channel of the river to the point of intersection with the range line between ranges eleven (11) and twelve (12) east, approximately in township three (3) north; thence south along the range line between ranges eleven (11) and twelve (12) to the township line between townships two (2) and three (3) south, the point of beginning.
County seat — Fairfield.

§ 31-116. Canyon county.

Canyon county is described as follows: beginning at a point in the middle of the channel of Snake river, where the line between township one (1) south, range one (1) west, and township one (1) south, range two (2) west, crosses said river;

Eastern boundary. Thence north to the northwest corner of township one (1) north, range one (1) west; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township two (2) north, range one (1) west; thence north to the northwest corner of section four (4), township three (3) north, range one (1) west; thence west to the northwest corner of township three (3) north, range one (1) west; thence north to the northwest corner of township five (5) north, range one (1) west (R. C., section 23h);

Northern boundary. Thence west on the township line between townships five (5) and six (6), to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) north, range three (3) west (1915, ch. 165, section 2, p. 363; 1917, ch. 11, section 2, p. 15); thence south on range line between ranges three (3) and four (4), one-half (½) mile to the east quarter corner of section one (1), township five (5) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the center line of sections one (1) and two (2), said township and range, two (2) miles to the east quarter corner of section three (3), said township and range; thence south along the section line one-half (½) mile to the southeast corner of section three (3), said township and range; thence west along the section line three (3) miles to the southwest corner of section five (5), said township and range; thence north along the section line one (1) mile to the northwest corner of section five (5), said township and range; thence west along the township line between townships five (5) and six (6) north, two (2) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-six (36), township six (6) north, range five (5) west; thence north along the section line one (1) mile to the northwest corner of section thirty-six (36), said township and range; thence west along the section line one (1) mile to the southwest corner of section twenty-six (26), said township and range; thence north along the section line one (1) mile to the southwest corner of section twenty-three (23), said township and range; thence west along the section line two (2) miles to the southwest corner of section twenty-one (21), said township and range; thence north along the section line three (3) miles to the northwest corner of section nine (9), said township and range; thence west along the section line one and one-half (1 ½) miles, more or less, to an intersection with the west line of the state of Idaho (1917, ch. 11, section 2, p. 15);

Western boundary. Thence up the middle of the channel of Snake river to the boundary line between Idaho and Oregon; thence south along the boundary line between Idaho and Oregon to the middle of Snake river;

Southern boundary. Thence up the middle of the channel of Snake river to the place of beginning (R. C., section 23h).

County seat — Caldwell.

§ 31-117. Caribou county.

Caribou county is described as follows: commencing at the northwest corner of township five (5) south, range thirty-nine (39) east of Boise meridian;

Northern boundary. Thence east along the township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south, Boise meridian, to the northeast corner of township five (5) south, range forty-six (46) east, Boise meridian, or to the Wyoming and Idaho state line;

Eastern boundary. Thence south along the Idaho and Wyoming state line to the corner of Bear Lake and Bannock counties;

Southern boundary. Thence in a westerly direction along the line between Bear Lake and Bannock counties to the southwest corner of township nine (9) south, range forty-two (42) east, Boise meridian; thence west along township line between nine (9) and ten (10) south, range forty-one (41) east, to the southwest corner of section thirty-two (32), township nine (9) south, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian;

Western boundary. Thence north three (3) miles along section line to the northwest corner of section twenty (20), township nine (9) south, range forty-one (41) east, thence west one (1) mile to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township nine (9) south, range forty-one (41) east; thence north nine (9) miles to the northwest corner of section six (6), township eight (8) south, range forty-one (41) east, thence west four (4) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township seven (7) south, range forty (40) east; thence north six (6) miles more or less to the northwest corner of section four (4), township seven (7) south, range forty (40) east; thence west along the line of first standard parallel one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range forty (40) east; thence north six (6) miles to the northwest corner of township six (6) south, range forty (40) east; thence west six (6) miles to the southwest corner of township five (5) south, range thirty-nine (39) east; thence north six (6) miles to place of beginning.

County seat — Soda Springs.

§ 31-118. Cassia county.

Cassia county is described as follows: beginning with the intersection of the middle of the channel of Snake river with the north and south center line of section twenty-eight (28), township ten (10) south, range twenty-one (21) east;

Western boundary. Thence south on the said center line of said section twenty-eight (28), to the point of intersection of the north line of the right of way of the Minidoka & Southwestern Railroad Company, which point is one hundred (100) feet distant at right angles from the center of the main track of the line of road of said railroad company as the same is now located; thence in a southwesterly direction along the north line of said railroad right of way to a point where said line intersects the south line of the canal right of way of the Twin Falls Land & Water Company, which point of intersection is one hundred (100) feet distant at right angles from the center line of the main canal of the said Twin Falls Land & Water Company; thence south to the south line of section thirty-six (36), township ten (10) south, range twenty (20) east; thence west to the southwest corner of said section thirty-six (36); thence south on the section lines to the south line of township eleven (11) south, thence west to the southeast corner of township eleven (11) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence south on the range lines to the south line of the state of Idaho (1907, p. 40);

Southern boundary. Thence east along the south boundary line of the state of Idaho to the intersection of the same with the one hundred thirteenth (113th) meridian west from Greenwich;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the said meridian to the intersection of the same with the (R.C., section 23i) southern line of township twelve (12) south; thence west upon and along the southern line of said township twelve (12), to the southwest corner of township twelve (12) south, range thirty (30) east; thence north upon the range line between ranges twenty-nine (29) and thirty (30) east, to the southwest corner of township nine (9) south, range thirty (30) east;

Northern boundary. Thence west along and upon the south line of township nine (9) south, to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence north upon and along the line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east, and an extension thereof to the point where said line so extended intersects the center of the main channel of Snake river (1913, ch. 6, section 2, p. 32); thence down the said river in a southwesterly direction to the point of beginning (R.C., section 23i).

County seat — Burley.

§ 31-119. Clark county.

Clark county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the Idaho-Montana state line directly north of the point where the east line of section four (4), township thirteen (13) north, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian, intersects the north line of said township thirteen (13) north;

Eastern boundary. Thence south to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirteen (13) north, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian; thence west along the south line of said township thirteen (13) to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirteen (13) north, range forty (40) east, Boise meridian; thence south along the range line between range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian, and range forty (40) east, Boise meridian, to its intersection with the south line of township twelve (12) north; thence west along the south line of said township twelve (12) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township twelve (12) north, range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian; thence south to what will be, when surveyed, the southeast corner of section sixteen (16), township ten (10) north, range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirteen (13), township ten (10) north, range thirty-eight (38) east, Boise meridian; thence south along the range line between range thirty-eight (38) east, Boise meridian, and range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian, to its intersection with the south line of township ten (10) north; thence west along the said south line of township ten (10) north, to its intersection with the range line between range thirty-seven (37) east, Boise meridian, and thirty-eight (38) east, Boise meridian; thence south along said range line to its intersection with the south line of township nine (9) north;

Southern boundary. Thence west along south line of said township nine (9), to its intersection with the range line between range thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian, and range thirty-two (32) east, Boise meridian; thence south along said range line to its intersection with the south line of township eight (8) north; thence west along said township line to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, range twenty-nine (29) east, the eastern boundary line of Butte county;

Western boundary. Thence north along the section line and the eastern boundary line of Butte county to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township ten (10) and eleven (11) north, range twenty-nine (29) east; thence east along said township line to its intersection with the range line between range thirty (30) east, Boise meridian, and range thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian, being the southeast corner of Lemhi county; thence north along said range line to the Idaho-Montana state line;

Northern boundary. Thence easterly along said state line to the point of beginning.

County seat — Dubois.

§ 31-120. Clearwater county.

Clearwater county is described as follows: beginning at the mouth of Lolo creek;

Southern boundary. Thence in a northeasterly direction up the middle of the channel to the head of said Lolo creek; thence northeasterly in a direct line to a point where the Montana-Idaho state line intersects the Lolo pass at the summit of the Bitter Root mountains;

Eastern boundary. Thence in a northwesterly direction along said Montana-Idaho state line to the intersection of the same with the northern boundary of township forty-one (41) north;

Northern boundary. Thence west along said northern boundary line to a point directly north of the mouth of the North Fork of Clearwater river;

Western boundary. Thence south to a point of intersection with the middle line of township thirty-eight (38) north; thence west along said middle line of township thirty-eight (38) north, to the northwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one (1) west; thence south to the north boundary line of the Nez Perce Indian reservation; thence easterly along said reservation line to the intersection of the same with the line running south between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), township thirty-seven (37) north, range one (1) west; thence south on the said line between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16) to the middle of the channel of Clearwater river; thence up the middle of the channel of said Clearwater river to a point where the same is intersected by the section line between sections five (5) and six (6), township thirty-six (36) north, range one (1) east; thence south on the section line between said sections five (5) and six (6) to the middle of the channel of Little Canyon creek; thence up the middle of the channel of Little Canyon creek to a point where the same intersects the seventh (7th) standard parallel north; thence east along said parallel to the middle of the channel of Clearwater river; thence up the middle of the channel of said Clearwater river to the point of beginning.

County seat — Orofino.

§ 31-121. Custer county.

Custer county is described as follows: beginning at the confluence of the Pahsimeroi river with the Salmon river thence up the Pahsimeroi river to the mouth of the Big creek; thence up Big creek, and on the line from the head thereof, with the general course of said creek to the summit of the divide between the waters of the Pahsimeroi and Lemhi rivers; thence southeasterly on the summit of said divide to a point west from the headwaters of said Little Lost river; thence east to the headwaters of said Little Lost river, thence down Little Lost river to the township line between townships ten (10) north and eleven (11) north; thence west along said township line to the corner common to townships twenty-five and twenty-six (25 and 26) east and townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north; thence south along the line between townships twenty-five (25) and twenty-six (26) east to the corner common to townships eight (8) and nine (9) north; thence west along the line between townships eight (8) and nine (9) north to the northwest corner of section two (2), township eight (8) north, range twenty-five (25) east B.M.; thence south along the west section line of section two (2) and eleven (11) to the northwest corner of section fourteen (14), township eight (8) north, range twenty-five (25) east B.M. to a point which is on the summit between the divide of Pass creek and Little Lost river; thence down said Pass creek to Big Lost river; thence along Big Lost river to the mouth of Antelope creek; thence up Antelope creek to the divide which separates its waters from those of Little Wood river; thence westerly along and upon the summit of the range of mountains dividing the headwaters of the East Fork of the Salmon river from the waters of the Little and Big Wood rivers, and continuing westerly on said divide between the East Fork of the Salmon and Wood rivers to the intersection of the longitude line of longitude one hundred fourteen (114) degrees, forty (40) minutes west from Greenwich, thence north on said longitude line to a point on said divide due east of the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence due west to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence west along and upon the section lines to the corner of sections fifteen (15), sixteen (16), twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence north along and upon the section lines to the corner of sections three (3) and four (4) and thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence north along and upon the section lines to the one-quarter (¼) section corner between sections twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28), township eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence west along and upon the one-quarter (¼) section lines to the west one-quarter (¼) section corner of section thirty (30), township eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence southwesterly along and upon the summit of the mountains dividing the waters of Yellow Belly lake and Pettit lake to the summit of the Sawtooth mountains; thence northerly along the summit of the Sawtooth mountains to the divide which separates the waters flowing into the South Payette river and Bear Valley creek from those flowing into the main Salmon river and Cape Horn creek; thence along said divide to the Middle Fork of the Salmon river; thence down the Middle Fork of the Salmon river to the mouth of Loon Creek; thence up Loon creek to the mouth of Warm Springs creek; (thence up Warm Springs creek); thence up Warm Springs creek and to the divide which separates the waters of Yankee Fork on the south and Loon and Deep creeks on the North, and following said divide in an easterly direction around the head of Panther creek, to the divide between Hat creek and Ellis creek; thence on the divide between Hat and Ellis creeks in an easterly direction to the Salmon river; thence up the main channel of said Salmon river, to the place of beginning.

County seat — Challis.

§ 31-122. Elmore county.

Elmore county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the top of the Sawtooth range of mountains, where the counties of Blaine, Boise, Custer and Elmore unite;

Eastern boundary. Thence in a southerly direction along the summit of the Sawtooth mountains to a point where the trail crosses the summit of what is known as the Mattingly Creek divide; thence in a southerly direction along the main divide between the middle fork and the south fork of the Boise river to a point on the divide between Willow creek and Bear creek; thence in a southerly direction on the main divide between Willow creek and Skeleton creek to the center of the channel of the south fork of the Boise river; thence down the channel of said river to the point of intersection with the range line between ranges eleven (11) and twelve (12) east, approximately in township three (3) north; thence south on the range line between ranges eleven (11) and twelve (12) east, to Snake river;

Southern boundary. Thence down the center of the channel of Snake river to a point where the section line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township five (5) south, range four (4) east, Boise meridian crosses said Snake river;

Western boundary. Thence in a northerly direction along the north and south center line of townships five (5), four (4), three (3), two (2) and one (1) south, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, to the base line and thence in a northerly direction along the north and south center line of townships one (1), two (2) and three (3) north, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, to a point in the center of the channel of the Boise river where the section line between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), township three (3) north, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, crosses said Boise river;

Northern boundary. Thence upon and along the boundary line of the county of Boise to the place of beginning.

County seat — Mountain Home.

§ 31-123. Franklin county.

Franklin county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the boundary line between the states of Utah and Idaho where the same is intersected by the section line between sections twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27), township sixteen (16) south, range thirty-seven (37) east;

Western boundary. Thence in a northerly direction along the section line as now surveyed to the southeast corner of section twenty-seven (27), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence easterly along section line as now surveyed, to the southeast corner of section twenty-six (26), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence continuing easterly along said line to a point which, when surveyed, will be the southeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence northerly along the western boundary of township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-eight (38) east, as now surveyed, to its intersection with the one-sixteenth (1/16) section line eighty (80) rods, more or less, south of the township line between townships thirteen (13) and fourteen (14) south;

Northern boundary. Thence east to the western boundary line of Bear Lake county;

Eastern boundary. Thence in a southerly direction along the western boundary of Bear Lake county to its intersection with the boundary between the states of Idaho and Utah;

Southern boundary. Thence westerly along the said boundary line to the point of beginning.

County seat — Preston.

§ 31-124. Fremont county.

Fremont county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the northern boundary of the state of Idaho intersects the range line between ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east;

Northern boundary. Thence easterly along the northern boundary of the state of Idaho to a point where said boundary line intersects the western boundary of the state of Wyoming (R. C., section 23
l
);

Eastern boundary. Thence south along the dividing line between Idaho and Wyoming to the point where said dividing line intersects with the North Fork of Bitch creek;

Southern boundary. Thence westerly and down said Bitch creek to where the same intersects the main channel of Teton river; thence down the center of the main channel of said Teton river, to where the same intersects the range line between ranges forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) east; thence south to the township line between townships six (6) and seven (7) north; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirty-five (35), township seven (7) north, range forty (40) east; thence north one (1) mile to the northeast corner of section thirty-five (35); thence west to the northeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township seven (7) north, range thirty-nine (39) east; thence north two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section twenty-two (22), township and range last aforesaid; thence west to the northeast corner of section twenty-one (21), township seven (7) north, range thirty-eight (38) east (1913, ch. 26, section 2, pp. 108, 109); thence north on said section line between said sections twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township and range last aforesaid, to the northeast corner of section four (4), township seven (7) north, range thirty-eight (38) east; thence west nine (9) miles to the southeast corner of township eight (8) north, range thirty-six (36) east; thence north six (6) miles to the northeast corner of said township eight (8) north, range thirty-six (36) east; thence west on the township line between townships eight (8) and nine (9) north, thirty (30) miles to the northeast corner of township eight (8) north, range thirty-one (31) east; thence south six (6) miles to the southeast corner of said township eight (8) north, range thirty-one (31) east; thence west on the township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, to a point on said township line north of the Big Southern Butte (1913, ch. 25, section 2, pp. 95, 96);

Western boundary. Thence north to the point where the line thus drawn intersects the township line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north; thence east along said township line to the southwest corner of township eleven (11) north, range thirty-one (31) east; thence north along the range line between ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, to the place of beginning (R. C., section 23p).

County seat — St. Anthony.

§ 31-125. Gem county.

Gem county is described as follows: beginning at the southeast corner of township six (6) north, range one (1) east; thence north twenty-four (24) miles, to the northeast corner of township nine (9) north, range one (1) east; thence east three (3) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township ten (10) north, range two (2) east; thence north twelve (12) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township twelve (12) north, range two (2) east; thence east three (3) miles to the southeast corner of township twelve (12) north, range two (2) east; thence north twelve (12) miles to the northeast corner of township thirteen (13) north, range two (2) east; thence west along the north boundary of said township and range, to the intersection with the east boundary of Adams county; thence in a southwesterly direction along the southeast boundary of Adams county, to its intersection with the boundary of Washington county; thence in a southerly direction along the east boundary of Washington county, to its intersection with the north boundary of Canyon county on the north line of township nine (9) north, range one (1) east; thence west along the north boundary of Canyon county to the northwest corner of section three (3), township nine (9) north, range one (1) west; thence south on the section line six (6) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33) of said township and range; thence west on the township line between townships eight (8) and nine (9), four (4) miles to the northwest corner of section one (1), township eight (8) north, range two (2) west; thence south on section line four (4) miles, to the southwest corner of section twenty-four (24), said township and range; thence west on section line two (2) miles, to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), said township and range; thence south on section line two (2) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), said township and range; thence west on township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8), seven (7) miles, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township eight (8) north, range three (3) west; thence south on section line twelve (12) miles, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township six (6) north, range three (3) west; thence east on township line between townships five (5) and six (6), twenty-two (22) miles, to place of beginning.

County seat — Emmett.

§ 31-126. Gooding county.

Gooding county is described as follows: beginning at the northeast corner of section six (6), township three (3) south, range sixteen (16) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence south twenty-four (24) miles, more or less, along the section line to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range sixteen (16) east; thence west one (1) mile, more or less, to the northwest corner of section five (5), township seven (7) south, range sixteen (16) east; thence south along the section line, to the thread of the Snake river;

Southern boundary. Thence northwesterly along the thread of the Snake river to the west line of township six (6) south, range twelve (12) east;

Western boundary. Thence north along the west line of range twelve (12) east, to the northwest corner of township three (3) south, range twelve (12) east;

Northern boundary. Thence east along the north line of township three (3) south, to the place of beginning.

County seat — Gooding.

§ 31-127. Idaho county.

Idaho county is described as follows: beginning at the junction of the Salmon river with the Snake river;

Northern boundary. Thence up the middle of the channel of Salmon river to the mouth of Deep creek; thence up the middle of the channel of Deep creek to the mouth of the Right Fork of Deep creek; thence up the middle of the channel of the Right Fork of Deep creek to a point where the line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west, crosses Deep creek; thence north along the said line to the point where the said line crosses Willow creek; thence down the middle of the channel of Willow creek to its junction with Lawyer’s canyon; thence down the middle of the channel of Lawyer’s canyon, to its junction with the Clearwater river; thence down the middle of the channel of Clearwater river to the mouth of Lolo creek; thence up the middle of the channel of Lolo creek to the head of Lolo creek; thence in a direct line to the Lolo pass at the summit of the Bitter Root mountains;

Eastern boundary. Thence southeasterly and southerly following the present defined boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Montana (1899, p. 79), to a point directly north of the confluence of the Middle Fork of Salmon river with the main Salmon river in the state of Idaho; thence south to the confluence of the Middle Fork of Salmon river with the main Salmon river; thence southerly along the center line or middle of the channel of said Middle Fork of Salmon river (R. C., section 23m), to its intersection with the fifth (5th) standard parallel north;

Southern boundary. Thence west along said parallel to the divide separating the waters of the Salmon and Payette rivers; thence westerly and southerly (1917, ch. 99, section 2, p. 360), along said divide, to the line of Adams county, at a point east of the northern point of Little Salmon Meadows; thence west to the Little Salmon river; thence down the Little Salmon river to a point east of the point where the section line between sections six (6) and seven (7), township twenty-two (22) north, range one (1) east, intersects the said meridian; thence west to the middle of the main channel of Snake river.

Western boundary. Thence down the middle of the main channel of Snake river, to the mouth of Salmon river, the place of beginning (R. C., section 23m).

County seat — Grangeville.

§ 31-128. Jefferson county.

Jefferson county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the township line between range thirty-one (31) and range thirty-two (32) east, intersects the township line between townships three (3) and four (4) north;

Southern boundary. Thence east along said township line between townships three (3) and four (4) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township four (4) north, range forty-one (41) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence north on the section line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township and range aforesaid, to the northeast corner of section twenty-eight (28), said township and range; thence west on the section line between sections twenty-one (21) and twenty-eight (28), said township and range, to where the same intersects with the center of the main channel of the South Fork of Snake river; thence down the main channel of said South Fork of Snake river to the conjunction of said stream with the North Fork of Snake river; thence down the center of the main channel of Snake river to a point where the same intersects the section line between sections twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township five (5) north, range thirty-eight (38) east; thence north on said section line between said sections twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township and range last aforesaid, to the northeast corner of section four (4), township seven (7) north, range thirty-eight (38) east; thence west nine (9) miles, to the southeast corner of township eight (8) north, range thirty-six (36) east; thence north six (6) miles, to the northeast corner of said township eight (8) north, range thirty-six (36) east;

Northern boundary. Thence west on the township line between townships eight (8) and nine (9) north, thirty (30) miles, to the northeast corner of township eight (8) north, range thirty-one (31) east;

Western boundary. Thence south (1913, ch. 25, section 2, p. 95) along the township line between range thirty-one (31) and range thirty-two (32) east (1917, ch. 98, section 2, p. 346), to the place of beginning.

County seat — Rigby.

§ 31-129. Jerome county.

Jerome county is described as follows: beginning at the northwest corner of section five (5), township seven (7) south, range sixteen (16) east, Boise meridian;

Northern boundary. Thence east thirteen (13) miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of section five (5), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east, Boise meridian; thence south two (2) miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of section nine (9), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east, Boise meridian; thence east one (1) mile, more or less, to the southeast corner of section nine (9), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east, Boise meridian; thence south one (1) mile, more or less, to the southwest corner of section fifteen (15), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east, Boise meridian; thence east fifteen (15) miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) south, range twenty (20) east, Boise meridian; thence south three (3) miles, more or less, to the northeast corner, section one (1), township eight (8) south, range twenty (20) east, Boise meridian; thence east six (6) miles, more or less, to the northeast corner of section one (1), township eight (8) south, range twenty-one (21) east, Boise meridian;

Eastern boundary. Thence south following the range line between ranges twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22) east, Boise meridian, to the center line of Snake river;

Southern boundary. Thence down the center line of the channel of said river, following its meanderings to a point where the same intersects the section line between sections seventeen (17) and eighteen (18) in township nine (9) south, range sixteen (16) east, Boise meridian;

Western boundary. Thence north to the place of beginning.

County seat — Jerome.